Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 4. Land Quality
§ 35-11-410.
License to mine for minerals; application.

A license to mine is issued for the duration of the mining operation on the permit area unless sooner revoked or suspended as provided herein. No mining operation of any kind may be commenced or conducted without a license to mine.

Any operator desiring to engage in a mining operation shall make a written application to the administrator on forms furnished by the administrator for a license to mine. A license is required for each mining operation for which a separate mining permit is issued. The application shall contain or be accompanied by:

The name and address of the applicant;

A copy of the mining permit for the lands which are to be affected by the proposed mining operation, and if the applicant is other than the permit holder, a copy of the instrument of permission from the permit holder granting to the applicant the rights thereto;

If the applicant for the license is other than the permit holder, a statement that the applicant has never had any permit issued by the administrator revoked, or license issued by the board revoked, or bond posted to comply with the act forfeited for intentional and substantial violation of the provisions of this act;

The location and number of acres of the area to be affected by the proposed mining operation for the first year of operation if less than the full extent of the permit area;

The estimated dates of commencement and termination of the proposed mining operation;

A fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00).

The administrator shall promptly review the license application and if he finds the application in order and consistent with the terms of the permit and any other provisions of this act, the administrator will determine the size of the bond to be posted for the purpose of insuring reclamation of the lands affected during the first year of operation and upon receipt of said bond will promptly issue the license.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.27; 2021 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00)" for "twenty-five dollars ($25.00)" in (b)(vi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Cited

in

Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

§ 35-11-411.
Annual report.

An operator shall file an annual report with the administrator on or within thirty (30) days prior to the anniversary date of each permit. The report shall include:

The name and address of the operator and the permit number;

A report in such detail as the administrator shall require supplemented with maps, cross sections, aerial photographs, photographs, or other material indicating:

The extent to which the mining operations have been carried out;

The progress of all reclamation work;

The extent to which expectations and predictions made in the original or any previous reports have been fulfilled, and any deviation therefrom, including but not limited to the quantity of overburden removed, the quantity of minerals removed, and the number of acres affected.

A revised schedule or timetable of operations and reclamation and an estimate of the number of acres to be affected during the next one (1) year period.

Upon receipt of the annual report the administrator shall make such further inquiry as shall be deemed necessary. If the administrator objects to any part of the report or requires further information he shall notify the permittee as soon as possible and shall allow a reasonable opportunity to provide the required information, or take such action as shall be necessary to remove the objection.

As soon as possible after the receipt of the annual report the administrator shall conduct an inspection of the site of the operation. A report of this inspection shall be made a part of the permittee’s annual report and a copy shall be delivered to the operator.

Within sixty (60) days after receipt of the annual report, inspection report and other required materials, if the administrator finds the annual report in order and consistent with the reclamation plan as set forth in the permit, or as amended to adjust to conditions encountered during mining and reclamation operations as provided by law, the director shall determine the size of the bond to be posted for the purpose of insuring reclamation of the lands affected during the ensuing year.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.28; Laws 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

§ 35-11-412.
License revocation or suspension.

The director shall revoke an operator’s license:

If at any time he becomes aware of the existence of any fact, reason, or condition that would have caused him to deny an application for a mining permit whether or not such condition existed at the time of the application;

If he determines that the operator intentionally misstated or failed to provide any fact that would have resulted in the denial of a license and which good faith compliance with the policies, purposes and provisions of this act would have required him to provide.

The director may suspend the license if he determines the operator is in substantial violation of the terms of the license or of the provisions of this act. The suspension shall be lifted when the violations have been corrected to the director’s satisfaction. No suspension shall be unreasonably prolonged.

Unless an emergency exists, the revocation or suspension of a license shall become effective upon thirty (30) days notice to the applicant. In the case of an emergency, the director may cause such revocation or suspension to become effective immediately upon receipt of notice.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.29; Laws 1975, ch. 198, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-413.
Special license to explore for minerals by dozing.

A special license to explore for minerals by dozing may be issued by the administrator for a one (1) year period without a permit.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.30; Laws 1975, ch. 198, § 2.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Federal Mineral Reservations,” X Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1975).

§ 35-11-414.
Special license to explore for minerals by dozing; application; standards; fee; bond; denial; appeal.

Any person desiring to engage in mineral exploration by dozing shall apply to the administrator for a special license. The application shall be in accordance with rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the standards set forth in subsection (b) of this section, by the council upon recommendation by the director after consultation with the administrator and advisory board, and shall be accompanied by a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).

The council shall establish rules and regulations pursuant to the following reclamation standards for exploration by dozing:

Backfilling the topsoil disturbed by dozing to its approximate original contour;

Revegetation of the land affected by dozing, including species to be used;

Timetables for the accomplishment of the above reclamation program.

After reviewing the application for special license to explore by dozing the administrator shall set the amount of the bond necessary to insure complete reclamation and issue the special license to explore.

The administrator may deny the special license to explore if he believes the application is in violation of the purpose of this act.

The decision of the administrator may be appealed through the director to the council.

All special licenses to explore issued by the administrator shall be reviewed by the council at their next regularly scheduled meeting.

A bond posted under the terms of this section shall be released upon completion of the exploration, by dozing, the reclamation program, and an inspection by the administrator. Failure to comply with the provisions of this section will result in forfeiture of the bond.

If the proposed exploration by dozing will substantially affect forty (40) or more acres in any four (4) contiguous sixteenth sections, the application shall conform to the reclamation standards and requirements governing surface mining, and the provisions of this section shall not apply.

Any abandoned drill hole shall be subject to the reclamation provisions of subsection 30-96.16(e) [repealed] of the statutes.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.31; Laws 1974, ch. 14, § 1; 1975, ch. 198, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 2021 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” in (a).

Editor's notes. —

Section 30-96.16, W.S. 1957, including subsection (e) thereof, referred to in subsection (j) of this section, was repealed by Laws 1977, ch. 140, § 2. For present similar provision, see § 35-11-404(c)(v).

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-415.
Duties of operator.

Every operator to whom any permit or license is issued shall comply with all requirements of this act, the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder, and reclamation plans and other terms and conditions of any permit or license.

The operator, pursuant to an approved surface mining permit and mining plan and reclamation plan, or any approved revisions thereto, shall:

Conspicuously post and maintain at each entrance to the operation, a sign which clearly shows the name, address and telephone number of the operator, the name of his local authorized agent, and the permit number of his operation;

Conduct all surface mining and reclamation activities within the permit area in conformity with his approved plan;

Protect the removed and segregated topsoil from wind and water erosion, and from acid or toxic materials, and preserve such in a usable condition for sustaining vegetation when restored in reclamation, or if topsoil is virtually nonexistent or is not capable of sustaining vegetation, then subsoil, which is available and suitable, shall be removed, segregated, and preserved in a like manner as may be required in the approved reclamation plan;

Cover, bury, impound, contain or otherwise dispose of toxic acid forming, or radioactive material or any material determined by the administrator to be hazardous to health and safety, or which constitutes a threat of pollution to surface or subsurface water as may be required in the approved reclamation plan;

Conduct contouring operations to return the land to the use set out in the reclamation plan;

Backfill or grade, and replace topsoil, or approved subsoil, which has been segregated and preserved as may be required in the approved reclamation plan;

Replace, as nearly as possible, native or superior self regenerating vegetation on land affected, as may be required in the approved reclamation plan;

Prevent, throughout the mining and reclamation operation, and for a period of five (5) years after the operation has been terminated, pollution of surface and subsurface waters on the land affected by the institution of plantings and revegetation, the construction of drainage systems and treatment facilities including settling ponds and the casing, sealing of boreholes, shafts, and wells so that no pollution is allowed to drain untreated into surface or subsurface water in accordance with state or federal water quality standards, whichever are higher, as may be required in the approved reclamation plan;

Reclaim the affected land as mining progresses in conformity with the approved reclamation plan;

For surface coal mining operations, preserve throughout the mining and reclamation process the essential hydrologic functions of alluvial valley floors if these areas are classified within a permit. This paragraph does not alter the authority granted under any other section of this act with respect to requirements for preserving throughout the mining and reclamation process the essential hydrologic functions of the minesite, or associated offsite areas, of other mining operations;

For surface coal mining operations, insure that explosives are used only in accordance with existing state and federal law and the rules and regulations promulgated by the council, which shall include but are not limited to provisions to:

Provide adequate advance written notice to local governments and residents who might be affected by the use of these explosives by publication of the planned blasting schedule in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality and by mailing a copy of the proposed blasting schedule to every resident within one-half (1/2) mile of the proposed blasting site and by providing daily notice to the resident or occupiers in these areas prior to any blasting;

Maintain for a period of at least three (3) years and make available for public inspection upon request a log detailing the location of the blasts, the pattern and depth of the drill holes, the amount of explosives used per hole, and the order and length of delay in the blast;

Limit the types of explosives and detonating equipment, the size, timing and frequency of blasts based upon the physical conditions of the site so as to prevent:

Injury to persons;

Damage to public and private property outside the permit area;

Adverse impacts on any underground mine;

A change in the course, channel or availability of ground or surface water outside the permit area.

Require that all blasting operations be conducted by trained and competent persons as certified by the administrator;

Provide that upon the request of a resident or owner of a man-made dwelling or structure within one-half (1/2) mile of any portion of the permitted area the applicant or permittee shall conduct a preblasting survey of these structures and submit the survey to the administrator and a copy to the resident or owner making the request. The area of the survey shall be decided by the administrator and shall include provisions as the United States secretary of the interior shall promulgate.

For surface coal mining operations, replace in accordance with state law the water supply of an owner of interest in real property who obtains all or part of his supply of water for domestic, agricultural, industrial or other legitimate use from an underground or surface source where the supply has been affected by contamination, diminution or interruption proximately resulting from the surface coal mine operation.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.32; Laws 1978, ch. 33, § 2; 1980, ch. 64, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
175.14 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-416.
Protection of the surface owner.

In those instances in which the surface owner is not the owner of the mineral estate proposed to be mined by mining operations a permit shall not be issued without the execution of a bond or undertaking to the state, whichever is applicable, for the use and benefit of the surface owner or owners of the land, in an amount sufficient to secure the payment for any damages to the surface estate, to the crops and forage, or to the tangible improvements of the surface owner. This amount shall be determined by the administrator and shall be commensurate with the reasonable value of the surrounding land, and the effect of the overall operation of the landowner. This bond is in addition to the performance bond required for reclamation by this act. As damage is determined it shall be paid. Financial loss resulting from disruption of the surface owner’s operation shall be considered as part of the damage. A bond for surface damage shall not be required when the agreement negotiated between the surface owner and the mineral owner or developer waives any requirement therefor. Payment of damages shall be paid annually unless otherwise agreed to by the surface owner and the operator.

An owner of real property and who holds a valid adjudicated water right and who obtains all or part of his supply of water for domestic, agricultural, industrial, recreational, or other legitimate use from a surface or an underground source other than a subterranean stream having a permanent distinct known channel may maintain an action against an operator to recover damages for pollution, diminution, or interruption of such water supply resulting from surface, in situ mining or underground mining.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.33; Laws 1974, ch. 14, § 1; 1975, ch. 198, §§ 2, 3; 1979, ch. 96, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Long-term lessee of land or holder of right-of-way easement is not “surface landowner”

or “surface owner” entitled to the protection of the statutory provisions requiring consent of a “surface landowner” and the posting of a bond to protect the “surface owner or owners.” Belle Fourche Pipeline Co. v. State, 766 P.2d 537,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. Jan. 9, 1989).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Federal Mineral Reservations,” X Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1975).

For case note, “Mining Law — Are Surface Lessees ‘Surface Owners’ Entitled to Protection of Consent and Bonding Provisions of Wyoming's Environmental Quality Act? Belle Fourche Pipeline Co. v. State, 766 P.2d 537,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1988),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 447 (1990).

§ 35-11-417.
Bonding provisions.

The purpose of any bond required to be filed with the administrator by the operator shall be to assure that the operator shall faithfully perform all requirements of this act and comply with all rules and regulations of the board made in accordance with the provisions of this act.

All bonds shall be signed by the operator as principal, by a good and sufficient corporate surety licensed to do business in the state, and be made payable to the state of Wyoming. At the discretion of the director, the record mineral owner of the land to be mined may also be required to join as principal. This subsection shall not apply to collateral bonds issued pursuant to subsection (g) of this section.

The amount of any bond to be filed with the administrator prior to commencing any mining shall be:

For an initial bond the amount equal to the estimated cost of reclaiming the affected land disturbed and restoring, as defined in W.S. 35-11-103(f)(iii), any groundwater disturbed by in situ mining during the first year of operation under each permit. The estimated cost shall be based on the operator’s cost estimate submitted with the permit plus the administrator’s estimate of the additional cost to the state of bringing in personnel and equipment should the operator fail or the site be abandoned. In no event shall the bond be less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), except for limited mining operations authorized and bonded under W.S. 35-11-401(e) or any noncoal mine the affected land of which, excluding roads, is ten (10) acres or less, in which case the bond amount shall be set by the administrator with approval of the director to cover the cost of reclamation, and in no event less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) per acre, for affected land;

For renewal bonds the amount equal to the estimated cost of reclaiming the land to be disturbed during that renewal period, and the estimated cost of completing reclamation of unreleased lands and groundwater disturbed during prior periods of time. The estimated cost shall be based on the operator’s cost estimate, which shall include any changes in the actual or estimated cost of reclamation of unreleased affected lands, plus the administrator’s estimate of the additional cost to the state of bringing in personnel and equipment should the operator fail or the site be abandoned. In no event shall the bond be less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), except for limited mining operations authorized and bonded under W.S. 35-11-401(e) or any noncoal mine the affected land of which, excluding roads, is ten (10) acres or less, in which case the bond amount shall be set by the administrator with approval of the director to cover the cost of reclamation, and in no event less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) per acre, for affected land.

The council may promulgate rules and regulations for a self-bonding program for mining operations under which the administrator may accept the bond of the operator itself without separate surety when the operator demonstrates to the satisfaction of the director the existence of a suitable agent to receive service of process and a history of financial solvency and continuous operation sufficient for authorization to self-insure or bond this amount. This subsection shall not become operative until the council has promulgated rules and regulations for the self-bonding program which require that the protection provided by self-bonding shall be consistent with the objectives and purposes of this act.

When the reclamation plan for any affected land has been completed, the administrator may recommend to the director the release of up to seventy-five percent (75%) of the bond required for that affected land. The remaining portion of the bond shall be not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), and shall be held for a period of at least five (5) years after the date of reduction to assure proper revegetation and restoration of groundwater. The retained portion of the bond may be returned to the operator at an earlier date if a release signed by the surface owner and approved by the administrator and director is obtained.

If the area of land or groundwater under permit to be disturbed is increased, then the amount of bond shall be increased to cover the added cost of reclaiming all affected lands or groundwater.

The council may, consistent with the requirements of 30 CFR 800.21(c), promulgate rules and regulations that allow the administrator to accept real property posted as a collateral bond without separate surety, provided that the real property is located in this state, the bond provides a perfected first lien security interest in the real property in favor of the department and the protection provided by the bond is consistent with the objectives and purposes of this act.

The council shall promulgate rules for a voluntary assigned trust program for coal, bentonite, trona and uranium permits or licenses to bond all or a portion of the full cost of reclamation as recommended by the administrator and determined by the director. This subsection shall not become operative until the governor has signed rules that the council promulgates for a voluntary assigned trust program that require that the protection provided by voluntary assigned trusts be consistent with the objectives and purposes of this act. Any rules promulgated under this subsection shall be in accordance with the following:

Participation in an assigned trust program shall be voluntary on the part of an operator. An operator seeking to participate in a voluntary assigned trust as part of the operator’s bonding option shall elect to create an assigned trust as required by rules promulgated by the council;

The amount necessary for an operator to fully fund the voluntary assigned trust shall be recommended by the administrator and determined by the director in accordance with the provisions of this article for each operator’s permit or license;

For each payment plan for a voluntary assigned trust:

The department shall provide the state treasurer with a copy of the director’s annual bond letter that discloses the reclamation obligation and the estimated mine life and duration of reclamation for each individual voluntary assigned trust;

Participants in the assigned trust shall provide annual payments of not less than one percent (1%) of the total annual reclamation bond obligation at any time until the assigned trust is fully funded and sufficient to cover the cost of the reclamation obligation as provided in W.S. 35-11-417(c);

Participants in the assigned trust shall provide other acceptable bonding instruments authorized by this act to cover the remaining full cost of reclamation.

The funds received for a voluntary assigned trust for coal shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized by law and in a manner to obtain the highest net return possible consistent with the preservation of one hundred percent (100%) of the corpus of the assigned trust. All earnings from investment of the corpus of the assigned trust shall be credited by the state treasurer to the balance of each voluntary assigned trust;

The funds received for a voluntary assigned trust for non-coal shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized by law and in a manner to obtain the highest net return possible less any administrative fees consistent with the preservation of the corpus of the assigned trust. All earnings from investment of the corpus of the assigned trust shall be credited by the state treasurer to the balance of each voluntary assigned trust;

The investment options of the treasurer shall include funds authorized by law. The investment fund options used shall be based on the corpus protection requirements as provided in paragraphs (iv) and (v) of this subsection. No funds shall be withdrawn by the participant from these accounts during the first year after the establishment of the participant’s voluntary assigned trust;

The participant shall deposit any cash into an irrevocable assigned trust, managed by the state treasurer for the benefit of the department. The assets of each assigned trust shall be available solely to cover the department’s cost of completing reclamation in the event of forfeiture. No portion of the trust assets shall be returned to the participant until trust assets are released in accordance with W.S.

35-11-423

;

Any remaining amounts within an assigned trust shall be released to the participant in the manner provided for bonds in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

35-11-423

after funds are applied to cover all costs of reclaiming the affected land. Reclamation funds from the assigned trust shall be withdrawn last, following certification of the requested bond release by the director. Bond reductions to the permit or license shall be made from any other bond instruments first until the assigned trust is fully funded;

Each assigned trust shall not be withdrawn until released by the director in accordance with this act and any rules promulgated under this act;

Any rules promulgated under this act shall include:

A process for withdrawal of funds that exceed the bond obligation of a participant;

Provisions for each assigned trust to be assigned to a new owner resulting from a permit or license transfer.

Permits or licenses that include federal lands with a federal bonding requirement may participate in the assigned trust following approval from the appropriate federal agencies.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.34; Laws 1974, ch. 14, § 1; 1978, ch. 33, § 2; ch. 49, § 1; 1979, ch. 96, § 2; 1980, ch. 66, § 1; 1981, ch. 68, § 1; ch. 165, § 1; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 2013 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2022 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “limited” for “sand and gravel, pumice, scoria or jade”, added “operations authorized and bonded under W.S. 35-11-401(e), added “noncoal”, and deleted “surface coal mines” in the third sentence in (c)(i) and (c)(ii).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), added the last sentence; and added (g).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (h).

Editor's notes. —

The reference to §

35-11-103

(f)(iii), in paragraph (c)(i), read as §

35-11-103

(a)(iii) in the printed acts but was renumbered to accurately reflect the contents of § 35-11-103.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (a) and (d), see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Application to preexisting operations. —

Both § 35-11-403(a)(ii) and subsection (c)(ii) of this section authorize the administrator to require a bond to ensure the reclamation of buildings and facilities existing prior to the enactment of this chapter. Universal Equip. Co. v. State, 839 P.2d 967,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 35-11-418.
Cash or securities in lieu of bond.

In lieu of a bond, the operator or its principal may deposit federally insured certificates of deposit payable to the Wyoming department of environmental quality, or cash or government securities, or irrevocable letters of credit issued by a bank organized to do business in the United States, or all four.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.35; Laws 1974, ch. 14, § 1; 1980, ch. 66, § 1.

§ 35-11-419.
Bond cancellation.

Such bond may be cancelled by the surety only after ninety (90) days notice to the director, and upon receipt of the director’s written consent, which may be granted only when the requirements of the bond have been fulfilled.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.36.

§ 35-11-420.
Cancellation of surety's license; substitution.

If the license to do business in Wyoming of any surety upon a bond filed pursuant to this act is suspended or revoked by any state authority then the operator, within thirty (30) days after receiving notice thereof, shall substitute a good and sufficient corporate surety licensed to do business in the state. Upon failure of the operator to make substitution of surety within a reasonable period of time, not to exceed sixty (60) days, the director shall suspend the permit of the operator to conduct operations upon the land described in the permit until proper substitution has been made.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.37.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-421.
Bond forfeiture proceedings.

If the director determines that a performance bond should be forfeited because of any violation of this act, he shall, with the approval of the council, make formal request of the attorney general to begin bond forfeiture proceedings.

The attorney general shall institute proceedings to forfeit the bond of any operator by providing written notice to the surety and to the operator that the bond will be forfeited unless the operator makes written demand to the council within thirty (30) days after his receipt of notice, requesting a hearing before the council. If no demand is made by the operator within thirty (30) days of his receipt of notice, then the council shall order the bond forfeited.

The council shall hold a hearing within thirty (30) days after the receipt of the demand by the operator. At the hearing, the operator may present for the consideration of the council statements, documents and other information with respect to the alleged violation. At the conclusion of the hearing, the council shall either withdraw the notice of violation or enter an order forfeiting the bond.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.38.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Surety is permitted, under doctrine of legal subrogation, to replace defunct operator

and to ask for a bond forfeiture hearing for the purpose of determining damages, if any, and to assert policy defenses. Allied Fid. Ins. Co. v. Environmental Quality Council, 753 P.2d 1038,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 35-11-422.
Forfeited bond inadequate; suit to recover reclamation costs.

If the forfeited bond is inadequate to cover the costs of the final reclamation program, the attorney general shall bring suit to recover the cost of the reclamation where recovery is deemed possible.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.39.

§ 35-11-423.
Release of bonds.

No bond shall be finally released until the reclamation program has been completed and approved by the administrator. The director may retain a portion of the bond for at least five (5) years as provided in W.S.

35-11-417

, or for so long thereafter as necessary to assure proper revegetation of the reclaimed areas, as provided for in the operator’s reclamation plan.

The retained portion of the bond may be returned to the operator at an earlier date if a release signed by the surface owner and approved by the administrator is obtained.

When the operator has completed successfully all surface mining and reclamation activities, he may request release of the retained bond. Upon receipt of the notification and request and within sixty (60) days, the administrator shall inspect and evaluate the reclamation work and report his findings to the director. If the director finds the reclamation meets the requirements of this act, he shall notify the operator and order the state treasurer to release that portion of the final bond. The state treasurer shall then return the bond, cash or securities constituting that portion of the bond so retained. If the director does not approve of the reclamation performed by the operator, he shall notify the operator by registered mail within a reasonable time after the request is filed. The notice shall state the reasons for denial and shall recommend corrective actions. Upon correction of the noted deficiency, the director shall order the state treasurer to release the bond, cash or securities constituting that portion of the bond so retained.

The council shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the release of bonds for surface coal mining operations in compliance with P.L. 95-87 [30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.] as that law is worded on August 3, 1977, which shall be controlling notwithstanding other provisions of W.S.

35-11-417

and

35-11-423

to the contrary.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.40; Laws 1978, ch. 33, § 2; 1980, ch. 64, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Public Law 95-87, referred to near the middle of subsection (d), appears as 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-424.
Deposit of fees and forfeitures.

All forfeitures collected under the provisions of this act shall be deposited with the state treasurer in a separate account for reclamation purposes.

All fees shall be deposited with the state treasurer in the general fund.

All fines and penalties collected under this act shall be paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.41; Laws 1992, ch. 91, § 7(a); 2005, ch. 157, § 2; ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 157, § 2, rewrote (c), which contained obsolete provisions.

Laws 2005, ch. 157, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2005.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the trust and agency fund” in (a).

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments by both 2005 acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Law reviews. —

See article, “The Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977: An Overview of Reclamation Requirements and Implementation,” XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 703 (1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for reclamation fees under § 402 of Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act (30 USCS § 1232), 117 ALR Fed 377.